Wisconsin, session 2025, AB589.
do enact as follows:AB589,11Section 1. 46.245 of the statutes is repealed.AB589,22Section 2. 48.375 (4) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB589,2,12348.375 (4) (a) 1. The person or the person’s agent has, either directly or 4through a referring physician or his or her agent, received and made part of the 5minor’s medical record, under the requirements of s. 253.10, the voluntary and 6informed written consent of the minor and the voluntary and informed written 7consent of one of her parents; or of the minor’s guardian or legal custodian, if one 8has been appointed; or of an adult family member of the minor; or of one of the 9minor’s foster parents, if the minor has been placed in a foster home and the 10minor’s parent has signed a waiver granting the department, a county department, 11or the foster parent the authority to consent to medical services or treatment on 12behalf of the minor.AB589,313Section 3. 69.186 (1) (hf) of the statutes is amended to read:AB589,3,5169.186 (1) (hf) The probable postfertilization age of the unborn child, as 2defined in s. 253.107 (1) (c), and whether an ultrasound was used to assist in 3making the determination of postfertilization age of the unborn child, or, if the 4probable postfertilization age of the unborn child was not determined, the nature of 5the medical emergency, as defined in s. 253.10 (2) (d) 253.107 (1) (b).AB589,46Section 4. 69.186 (1) (k) of the statutes is amended to read:AB589,3,9769.186 (1) (k) If the unborn child is considered to be capable of experiencing 8pain under s. 253.107 (3) (a), the nature of the medical emergency, as defined in s. 9253.10 (2) (d) 253.107 (1) (b), that the pregnant woman had.AB589,510Section 5. 253.095 of the statutes is repealed.AB589,611Section 6. 253.10 of the statutes is repealed.AB589,712Section 7. 253.105 of the statutes is repealed.AB589,813Section 8. 253.107 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB589,3,1614253.107 (1) (b) “Medical emergency” has the meaning given in s. 253.10 (2) (d) 15means a condition, in a physician’s reasonable medical judgment, that makes an 16abortion necessary.AB589,917Section 9. 441.07 (1g) (f) of the statutes is repealed.AB589,1018Section 10. 448.02 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB589,4,1319448.02 (3) (a) The board shall investigate allegations of unprofessional 20conduct and negligence in treatment by persons holding a license or certificate 21granted by the board. An allegation that a physician has violated s. 253.10 (3), 22448.30 or 450.13 (2) or has failed to mail or present a medical certification required 23under s. 69.18 (2) within 21 days after the pronouncement of death of the person 24who is the subject of the required certificate or that a physician has failed at least 6 1times within a 6-month period to mail or present a medical certificate required 2under s. 69.18 (2) within 6 days after the pronouncement of death of the person who 3is the subject of the required certificate is an allegation of unprofessional conduct. 4Information contained in reports filed with the board under s. 49.45 (2) (a) 12r., 550.36 (3) (b), 609.17 or 632.715, or under 42 CFR 1001.2005, shall be investigated 6by the board. Information contained in a report filed with the board under s. 7655.045 (1), as created by 1985 Wisconsin Act 29, which is not a finding of 8negligence or in a report filed with the board under s. 50.36 (3) (c) may, within the 9discretion of the board, be used as the basis of an investigation of a person named in 10the report. The board may require a person holding a license or certificate to 11undergo and may consider the results of one or more physical, mental or 12professional competency examinations if the board believes that the results of any 13such examinations may be useful to the board in conducting its investigation.AB589,1114Section 11. 448.02 (3) (a) of the statutes, as affected by 2023 Wisconsin Act 15172, section 4, and 2025 Wisconsin Act .... (this act), is repealed and recreated to 16read:AB589,5,1117448.02 (3) (a) The board shall investigate allegations of unprofessional 18conduct and negligence in treatment by persons holding a license or certificate 19granted by the board. An allegation that a physician has violated s. 448.30 or 20450.13 (2) or has failed to present a medical certification required under s. 69.18 (2) 21within 21 days after the pronouncement of death of the person who is the subject of 22the required certificate or that a physician has failed at least 6 times within a 6-23month period to present a medical certificate required under s. 69.18 (2) within 6 24days after the pronouncement of death of the person who is the subject of the 1required certificate is an allegation of unprofessional conduct. Information 2contained in reports filed with the board under s. 49.45 (2) (a) 12r., 50.36 (3) (b), 3609.17, or 632.715, or under 42 CFR 1001.2005, shall be investigated by the board. 4Information contained in a report filed with the board under s. 655.045 (1), as 5created by 1985 Wisconsin Act 29, which is not a finding of negligence or in a report 6filed with the board under s. 50.36 (3) (c) may, within the discretion of the board, be 7used as the basis of an investigation of a person named in the report. The board 8may require a person holding a license or certificate to undergo and may consider 9the results of one or more physical, mental or professional competency 10examinations if the board believes that the results of any such examinations may be 11useful to the board in conducting its investigation.AB589,1212Section 12. 457.26 (2) (gm) of the statutes is repealed.AB589,1313Section 13. 940.15 (5) of the statutes is repealed.AB589,1414Section 14. Nonstatutory provisions.AB589,5,1715(1) Reference changes. Wherever a reference to s. 253.10 (2) (a) appears in 16the statutes, the legislative reference bureau shall substitute a reference to s. 69.01 17(13m), as it defines the term “induced abortion.”AB589,1518Section 15. Effective dates. This act takes effect on the day after 19publication, except as follows:AB589,5,2020(1) The repeal and recreation of s. 448.02 (3) (a) takes effect on March 1, 2026.AB589,5,2121